Hawaii statutes.
§329-58 Education and research. (a)
The department of public safety shall carry out educational programs designed
to prevent and determine misuse and abuse of controlled substances. In
connection with these programs it may:

(1) Promote better recognition of the problems of
misuse and abuse of controlled substances within the regulated industry and
among interested groups and organizations;

(2) Assist the regulated industry and interested
groups and organizations in contributing to the reduction of misuse and abuse
of controlled substances;

(3) Consult with interested groups and organizations
to aid them in solving administrative and organizational problems;

(4) Evaluate procedures, projects, techniques, and
controls conducted or proposed as part of educational programs on misuse and
abuse of controlled substances;

(5) Disseminate the result of research on misuse and
abuse of controlled substances to promote a better public understanding of what
problems exist and what can be done to combat them;

(6) Assist in the education and training of state and
local law enforcement officials in their efforts to control misuse and abuse of
controlled substances.

(b) The department of public safety may
authorize persons engaged in research on the use and effects of controlled
substances to withhold the names and other identifying characteristics of
individuals who are the subjects of the research. Persons who obtain this
authorization are not compelled in any civil, criminal, administrative,
legislative, or other proceeding to identify the individuals who are subjects
of research for which the authorization was obtained.

(c) The department of public safety may
authorize the possession and distribution of controlled substances by persons
engaged in research. Persons who obtain this authorization are exempt from
state prosecution for possession and distribution of controlled substances to
the extent of the authorization. [L 1972, c 10, pt of §1; am L 1990, c 281,
§10; am L Sp 1993, c 8, §54; am L 2004, c 216, §38]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next